Indiana, session 2026, HB1160.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-30-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 141, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each school corporation shall
include in the school corporation's curriculum the following studies:
(1) Language arts, including:
(A) English;
(B) grammar;
(C) composition;
(D) speech; and
(E) second languages.
(2) Mathematics.
(3) Social studies and citizenship, including the:
(A) constitutions;
(B) governmental systems; and
(C) histories;
of Indiana and the United States, including an enhanced study of
the Holocaust in each high school United States history course.
2026 IN 1160—LS 6683/DI 143


As part of the United States government credit awarded for the
general, Core 40, Core 40 with academic honors, and Core 40
with technical honors designation, each high school shall
administer the naturalization examination provided by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(4) Sciences, including, after June 30, 2021, computer science.
(5) Fine arts, including music and art.
(6) Health education, physical fitness, safety, and the effects of
alcohol, tobacco, drugs, and other substances on the human body.
(7) Additional studies selected by each governing body, subject
to revision by the state board.
(8) As part of the United States government credit awarded
for the general, Core 40, Core 40 with academic honors, and
Core 40 with technical honors designation, each high school
shall administer the naturalization examination provided by
the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. This
subdivision expires June 30, 2030.
(b) Not later than November 1 each year, the department shall report
to the general assembly in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 the
following:
(1) The number of students who took the naturalization
examination described in subsection (a)(3). (a)(8).
(2) The number of students who passed the naturalization
examination described in subsection (a)(3) (a)(8) by a score of not
less than sixty seventy percent (60%) (70%) on their first
attempt.
(3) The pass rate of the naturalization examination regarding the
students who passed as described in subdivision (2).
This subsection expires June 30, 2030.
(c) Not more than thirty (30) days after the department reports to the
general assembly the information under subsection (b), the department
shall post the pass rate under subsection (b)(3) on the department's
website. This subsection expires June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2. IC 20-30-5-26.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26.5. (a) Each school shall
administer the naturalization examination provided by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services according to the
following schedule:
(1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and continuing
thereafter, in grade 8.
(2) Beginning with the 2030-2031 school year and continuing
2026 IN 1160—LS 6683/DI 143


thereafter, in high school.
(b) Not later than November 1 each year, the department shall
report to the general assembly in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6 the following:
(1) The number of students who took the naturalization
examination described in subsection (a).
(2) The number of students who passed the naturalization
examination described in subsection (a) by a score of not less
than seventy percent (70%) on their first attempt.
(3) The pass rate of the naturalization examination regarding
the students who passed as described in subdivision (2).
(c) Not more than thirty (30) days after the department reports
to the general assembly the information under subsection (b), the
department shall post the pass rate under subsection (b)(3) on the
department's website.
SECTION 3. IC 20-32-4-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) This section applies to an individual who is a
student in a cohort that is expected to graduate in 2031 or
thereafter from a:
(1) public school, including a charter school; or
(2) state accredited nonpublic school.
(b) Beginning in 2031, in addition to completing the graduation
requirements set forth in this article, a student described in this
section must successfully complete the naturalization examination
provided by the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services with a score of seventy percent (70%) or higher to
graduate from high school. A student who achieves a score of
seventy percent (70%) or higher during the administration of the
naturalization exam described in IC 20-30-5-26.5(a)(1) has satisfied
this requirement.
(c) A student described in this section who fails to achieve a
score of seventy percent (70%) or higher during the administration
of the naturalization exam described in IC 20-30-5-26.5(a)(2) may
retake the naturalization exam.
(d) A student described in this section who:
(1) has an individualized education program; and
(2) earns a certificate of completion;
may be granted an academic waiver for the requirement described
in subsection (b).
2026 IN 1160—LS 6683/DI 143